Missouri, session 2026, HB1913.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 537 and 573, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 537.043 and 573.570, to read as follows:
537.043. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Consent", consent or lack of consent may be expressed or implied. Assent
does not constitute consent if:
(a) It is given by a person who lacks the mental capacity to authorize the conduct
charged to constitute the offense and such mental incapacity is manifest or known to the
creator;
(b) It is given by a person who by reason of youth, mental disease or defect,
intoxication, a drug-induced state, or any other reason is manifestly unable or known by
the creator to be unable to make a reasonable judgment as to the nature or harmfulness
of the conduct charged to constitute the offense; or
(c) It is induced by force, duress, or deception;
(2) "Creator", any person who utilizes or deploys artificial intelligence or other
digital technology to generate synthetic media. "Creator" shall not include the provider
or developer of any technology used in the creation of synthetic media;
(3) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by
means of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital
depiction and who is identifiable by virtue of the individual’s face, likeness, or other
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1913 2
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature,
or from information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;
(4) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;
(5) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of
an identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(6) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.
2. Except as provided in subsection 8 of this section, an individual who is the
subject of an intimate digital depiction that is disclosed without the consent of the
individual where such disclosure was made by a creator who knows that or recklessly
disregards whether the individual has not consented to such disclosure may bring a civil
action against that other person in an appropriate circuit court for relief as set forth in
subsections 5 and 6 of this section.
3. In the case of an individual who is under eighteen years of age or is
incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardian of the individual or
representative of the individual's estate, another family member, or any person
appointed as suitable by the court may assume the individual's rights under this section,
but in no event shall the defendant be named as such representative or guardian.
4. For the purposes of an action under subsection 2 or 3 of this section:
(1) An individual's consent to the creation of the intimate digital depiction shall
not establish that the individual consented to its disclosure;
(2) Consent shall be deemed validly given only if:
(a) It is set forth in an agreement written in plain language signed knowingly and
voluntarily by the depicted individual; and

HB 1913 3
(b) The written agreement includes a general description of the intimate digital
depiction and, if applicable, the audiovisual work into which the depiction will be
incorporated.
5. In a civil action filed under this section, an individual may recover any of the
following:
(1) An amount equal to the monetary gain made by the defendant from the
creation, development, or disclosure of the intimate digital depiction;
(2) Either of the following:
(a) The actual damages sustained by the individual as a result of the intimate
digital depiction, including damages for emotional distress; or
(b) Liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars;
(3) Punitive damages; and
(4) The cost of the action, including reasonable attorney's fees and other
litigation costs reasonably incurred.
6. In a civil action filed under this section, a court may, in addition to any other
relief available at law, order equitable relief including a temporary restraining order, a
preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction ordering the defendant to cease
display or disclosure of the intimate digital depiction.
7. In ordering relief under this section, the court may grant injunctive relief
maintaining the confidentiality of a plaintiff by using a pseudonym.
8. An identifiable individual shall not bring an action for relief under this section
relating to:
(1) A disclosure made in good faith:
(a) To or by a law enforcement officer or agency in the course of reporting or
investigating unlawful activity or unsolicited or unwelcome conduct; or
(b) As part of a legal proceeding;
(2) A matter of legitimate public concern or public interest, except that it shall
not be considered a matter of legitimate public interest or public concern solely because
the depicted individual is a public figure; or
(3) A disclosure reasonably intended to assist the identifiable individual.
9. A court may authorize an in camera proceeding under this section.
10. It shall not be a defense to an action under this section that there is a
disclaimer stating that the intimate digital depiction of the depicted individual was
unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate in the creation or
development of the material.
11. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an interactive computer service
shall not be held liable due to:

HB 1913 4
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to restrict access to or availability
of intimate digital depictions;
(2) Content provided by another person; or
(3) Any action taken to enable or make available to information content
providers or other persons the technical means to restrict access to intimate digital
depictions.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by
means of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital
depiction and who is identifiable by virtue of the individual’s face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature,
or from information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;
(3) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of
an identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(4) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital depiction if
the person discloses or threatens to disclose an intimate digital depiction:
(1) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm
to the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(2) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless disregard for whether, such
disclosure or threatened disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or
economic harm to the depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class E felony.

HB 1913 5
(2) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent violation of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction could be reasonably expected
to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of
a federal, state, local, or tribal government agency, including the administration of an
election or the conduct of foreign relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
4. It shall not be a defense to an action under this section that there is a
disclaimer stating that the intimate digital depiction of the depicted individual was
unauthorized or that the depicted individual did not participate in the creation or
development of the material.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability upon the
following entities:
(1) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230(f)(2);
(2) A provider of public mobile services or private mobile radio services, as those
terms are defined under section 573.110; and
(3) A telecommunications network or broadband provider.
✔